Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Retirement Allowances, Disability Benefits, and Spouses’ Benefits

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, Chapter 513-5-1.

Law reviews.

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

47-3-120.
Allowance on service retirement; minimum retirement allowance; reduced allowance; increase; computation of average compensation.

Upon service retirement, a member shall receive an allowance which shall consist of:

An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of retirement; and

An annual pension which, together with the annuity set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall provide a total allowance equal to 2 percent of the member’s average compensation over the two consecutive years of membership service producing the highest such average, multiplied by the number of the member’s years of creditable service, not to exceed 40. The computation of average compensation for the purposes of this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section.

(a.1)

The minimum allowance to be received by any member upon retirement shall not be less than $17.00 per month for each year of creditable service, not to exceed 40 years of creditable service.

In the case of any member who has less than 30 years of creditable service and if such member has not reached the age of 60 years upon retirement, the service allowance set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be reduced by the lesser of one-twelfth of 7 percent for each month by which his age at the time of retirement is below 60 years or by 7 percent for each year or fraction of a year by which the member has less than 30 years of creditable service at the time of retirement. This reduction shall not apply in calculating the service allowance for disability retirement or death. Any member who retired with 30 or more years of creditable service and whose retirement benefits were reduced because such member retired at an age below the normal retirement age in effect at the time such member retired shall be entitled to an adjusted retirement benefit based upon a calculation made without the application of the age reduction factor. Any member retiring with less than 30 years of creditable service or who has not obtained the age of 60 at the time of retirement shall not become eligible for postretirement benefit adjustments as provided in Code Section 47-3-126 until such time as the member reaches the age of 60 or would have obtained 30 years of creditable service, whichever occurs earlier.

To the extent that the necessary funds are appropriated for such purpose by the General Assembly, the board of trustees shall increase the retirement benefits of beneficiaries under this chapter when the retirement benefit formula provided for in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section is changed to result in an increase in retirement benefits. The basis for such increase shall be the average percentage of increase in retirement benefits which results from the change in the retirement benefit formula. This subsection shall apply to all changes in the retirement benefit formula which have become effective since June 30, 1975, and those which may become effective at any time after June 30, 1977, for all beneficiaries under this chapter who retired on or before June 30, 1977. Any member who retires at any time after June 30, 1977, shall receive the benefit adjustment provided for in this subsection only for those changes in the retirement benefit formula which become effective after his retirement. If the General Assembly at any time appropriates some but not all of the funds necessary to fund the benefit adjustments provided for in this subsection, then the benefit adjustment otherwise payable under this subsection shall be reduced pro rata by the board of trustees in accordance with the funds actually appropriated by the General Assembly for such purpose.

No more than two increases in compensation granted during the two consecutive years on which average compensation is based under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be considered in the computation of such average compensation. For those members who are not employees of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, that part of any such increase in compensation which exceeds a percentage equal to the average annual increase in compensation granted to classroom teachers by appropriations of the General Assembly, plus 2 1/2 percent of compensation received at the time the annual increase granted by appropriations becomes effective, shall not be considered in the computation of average compensation. For those members who are employees of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, that part of any such increase in compensation which exceeds a percentage equal to the average annual increase in compensation granted to academic personnel employed by said board of regents by appropriations of the General Assembly, plus 2 1/2 percent of compensation received at the time the annual increase granted by appropriations becomes effective, shall not be considered in the computation of average compensation.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 5; Ga. L. 1950, p. 261, § 4; Ga. L. 1961, p. 392, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 208, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 513, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 562, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 384, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 620, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 140, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 896, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 895, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1141, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 357, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1328, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 599, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1913, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1004, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1562, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1892, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1894, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1314, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 620, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1262, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 249, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2476, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1.

47-3-121.
Optional retirement allowances; election of such options; revocation of election; effect of divorce.

Until the first payment of any member’s retirement allowance becomes normally due, he may elect to convert the retirement allowance, otherwise payable to him, into a modified retirement allowance of equivalent actuarial value in accordance with one of the optional forms named below, provided that if he dies within 30 days after retirement, his optional election shall not be effective and he shall be considered to have been a member in service at the time of his death.

Option one shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance payable during the life of the retired member, with the provision that, if he dies before he has received, in payments of his annuity, the amount of his accumulated contributions at the time of his retirement, the balance of such amount shall be paid to the person, if any, nominated by him by written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees, otherwise to the retired member’s estate.

Option two shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance payable during the life of the retired member, with the provision that after his death the reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to the person nominated by him by written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his retirement.

Option three shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance payable during the life of the retired member, with the provision that after his death one-half of the reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to the person nominated by him by written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his retirement.

Option four shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance payable during the life of the retired member, with the provision that upon his death some other benefit shall be payable, provided that the total value of the retirement allowance payable during his life and the succeeding benefit shall be computed to be of equivalent actuarial value to the retirement allowance which he would receive had he not chosen an optional retirement allowance under this Code section; provided, further, that the benefit shall be approved by the board of trustees.

(e.1)

Option five shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance together with a partial lump sum distribution. This option may be elected by any retiring member including members electing another optional allowance under this Code section except that this option shall not be available to members retiring pursuant to Code Section 47-3-122 or members subject to the requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 47-3-120. The amount of the lump sum distribution under this subsection may not exceed the sum of 36 months of the monthly retirement allowance the retiring member would have received had he or she not elected the partial lump sum option. The partial lump sum distribution will be made as a single payment payable at the time the first monthly retirement allowance is paid to the retired member.

Whenever any member has elected an optional allowance under this Code section and has nominated his spouse to receive all amounts and benefits payable on or after his death as a result of such election, the member may revoke the election at any time after the entry of a final judgment of complete divorce from the spouse so nominated. Upon any such revocation, the member may elect to return to the retirement allowance otherwise payable to him or to elect to convert the retirement allowance otherwise payable to him into a modified retirement allowance of equal actuarial value as of the time of the election and in accordance with one of the optional forms named in subsections (b) through (e) of this Code section.

The board of trustees shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this Code section.

Upon the death of the retired member and then the death of the person designated by him or her to receive continuing retirement benefits under option two, three, four, or five if the total monthly benefits paid, including any partial lump sum distribution, to the retired member and to such person designated to receive continuing benefits do not equal or exceed the retired member’s accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement, the difference shall be refunded to the person designated in writing by the retired member to receive such a refund of this difference. If no such person is designated to receive this difference, or if such designated person has predeceased the person designated to receive continuing monthly retirement benefits, or if such designees are the same person, this difference shall be paid to the estate of the person designated to receive continuing monthly retirement benefits.

Upon the death of the person designated by the retired member to receive continuing monthly retirement benefits under option two, three, four, or five and then the death of the retired member, if the total monthly benefits paid, including any partial lump sum distribution, to the retired member prior to his or her death do not equal or exceed the retired member’s accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement, the difference shall be refunded to the person designated in writing by the retired member to receive such a refund of this difference. If the person designated by the retired member to receive a refund of this difference also predeceases the retired member, or if such designees are the same person, or if no person is designated to receive this difference, this difference shall be paid to the estate of the retired member.

Any other provisions of this Code section or of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the board of trustees may, by rule or regulation, require that when a member or a retired member dies and the beneficiary is a person other than the surviving spouse of the member, the benefits payable to the beneficiary shall be paid to the beneficiary within a definite time period immediately following the death of the member or retired member.

Any retired member who elected option two, three, or four may, after the death of the person designated by the retired member to continue receiving monthly benefits, revoke the election and elect a new option providing for a retirement allowance computed to be the actuarial equivalent of the retirement allowance in effect immediately prior to the effective date of the new option. Such new option shall be effective on the first day of the month following the month in which such new election is made.

If a member has elected an optional allowance under this Code section and has nominated his or her spouse and one or more other persons to receive all amounts and benefits payable on or after his or her death as a result of such election, then after the entry of a final judgment of complete divorce from the spouse so nominated the member may revoke the election as to such spouse. Upon any such revocation, the member may elect one of the following options:

The member may allocate the spouse’s percentage among the beneficiaries other than the spouse, in which event the member’s benefit shall be recalculated to compensate for the remaining survivor’s benefit as determined by an actuary; or

The beneficiaries other than the spouse shall continue to be entitled to receive the same percentage of the member’s retirement allowance they had before the revocation, and the member’s benefit shall return to the allowance which would otherwise be payable to him or her if he or she had not elected such option, reduced to compensate for the remaining survivor’s benefit as determined by an actuary.

This subsection shall apply to final judgments received by the retirement system on or after July 1, 2008. Any adjustments shall be effective on the first day of the month following the receipt of the final judgment by the retirement system. In no event shall any adjustment be made effective retroactively.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 5; Ga. L. 1977, p. 841, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1894, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 810, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1554, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 175, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 589, §§ 1, 2, 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 144, § 1/HB 656.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added subsection (l).

Cross references.

Revocation of election of benefits for public employees upon divorce, §

47-3-121

.

47-3-122.
Eligibility and application for disability benefits; amount of disability benefits; reexamination of recipients; reduction.

Any member who is in service or on authorized leave may retire on disability upon written application to the board of trustees if the member has at least ten years of creditable service at the time of retirement and if the member’s application for disability retirement is approved by the medical board. The medical board shall approve the application if, after a medical examination of such member by a qualified physician appointed by the board of trustees, it finds that the applicant is mentally or physically incapacitated for further performance of duty involving active membership with the retirement system, that such incapacity is likely to be permanent, and that the applicant should be retired. The effective date of retirement will be the first of the month in which the application is received by the board of trustees, provided that no retirement application will be effective earlier than the first of the month following the final month of the applicant’s employment. Applications for retirement will not be accepted more than 90 days in advance of the effective date of retirement.

(a.1)

If the board of trustees determines by clear and convincing evidence presented to the board by or on behalf of the member that the disability itself was the cause of failure to file a timely application for disability retirement, the board of trustees is authorized to calculate the annual benefit provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section as if the member had retired on such effective date of disability retirement increased by any increases in benefits which the member would have received if he or she had retired on that date and adjust the benefits of such retiree as of the first of the month following such determination; provided, however, that the board of trustees is not authorized to pay retroactive disability benefits. This subsection applies to former members who became disabled at any time prior to July 1, 1996, as well as to former members who become disabled on or after July 1, 1996.

If a disabled member qualifies for either service retirement or disability retirement, he shall receive the greater amount.

The disability benefit allowance shall consist of:

An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his accumulated contributions at the time of his retirement derived through the application of disability actuarial mortality tables approved by the board of trustees; and

An annual pension computed under the formula set forth in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-120, but with no reduction in benefits set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 47-3-120 for retirement under the age of 60.

If a member who has retired on a disability retirement allowance elects an option under Code Section 47-3-121 rather than the maximum allowance, then the member will receive a reduced retirement allowance based on actuarial disability mortality tables adopted by the board of trustees. The nearest whole year of the attained ages of both the retiring member and his designated beneficiary at the date of his retirement shall be used in the application of such actuarial tables in order to determine the monthly retirement benefits.

Once each year during the first five years following retirement of a member on a disability retirement allowance and once in every three-year period thereafter, the board of trustees may require a disability beneficiary who has not yet attained age 60 to undergo a medical examination, such examination to be made at his place of residence or other place mutually agreed upon, by a physician or physicians designated by the medical board. Such beneficiary may himself request such an examination. If any disability beneficiary who has not yet attained age 60 refuses to submit to such medical examination, his pension may be discontinued by the board of trustees until his withdrawal of such refusal; and if his refusal continues for one year, all his rights in and to his pension may be revoked by the board of trustees.

If it is determined that a disability beneficiary is engaged in a gainful occupation or if the medical board reports and certifies to the board of trustees that a disability beneficiary is able to engage in a gainful occupation paying more than the difference between his disability retirement benefit and the current rate of compensation for the position which he held at the time of his disability retirement, the board of trustees may reduce his retirement benefit to an amount at which his total retirement benefit together with the amount earnable by him equals the current rate of compensation for the position which he held at the time of his disability retirement, as determined by the board of trustees. The board of trustees may make further changes in his disability benefit in response to further change in his earning capacity, provided that the new pension shall not cause the total of his disability retirement benefit together with the amount earnable by him to exceed the current rate of compensation, as determined by the board of trustees, for the position which he held at the time of his disability retirement.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 5; Ga. L. 1950, p. 261, § 5; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 373, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 114, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1956, p. 400, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 392, § 3; Ga. L. 1963, p. 542, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 267, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 438, § 5; Ga. L. 1969, p. 388, § 2; Ga. L. 1970, p. 217, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 140, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 896, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 905, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1023, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2180, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 302, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 427, §§ 9, 10/HB 969.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 24, 2010, substituted “60” for “62” at the end of paragraph (c)(2) and twice in subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 2180, § 1, which would have amended subsection (a) and added subsection (a.1) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and was repealed on July 1, 1992. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1992, p. CDV.

47-3-123.
Benefits payable upon the death of a member before retirement.

Upon death of any member in service, the beneficiary nominated by the member by means of a written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees shall be entitled to:

A cash refund of the member’s contributions and interest accumulated at the date of the member’s death;

A monthly benefit computed in the same manner as though the member had retired as of the date of death on either a service retirement allowance as provided for in Code Section 47-3-120 or a disability retirement allowance as provided for in Code Section 47-3-122 and elected option two, whichever calculation produces the larger benefit; or

A choice of electing the benefits under either paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection.

The benefit to which the beneficiary is entitled shall depend on the beneficiary designation form on file with the retirement system and the deceased member’s creditable service. In order for a beneficiary to be eligible for a monthly death benefit under paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection, the deceased member must have had a minimum of ten years of creditable service at the time of death. The nearest year of the attained ages of both the member and the beneficiary at the time of the member’s death will be used in the application of appropriate actuarial tables and in determining the monthly benefits of the beneficiary. A monthly death benefit shall commence the first day of the month following the month in which the member’s death occurred.

Upon the death of a member in service who has not named a beneficiary on a beneficiary designation form filed with the retirement system and who has:

Less than ten years of creditable service, the death benefit shall consist of a refund to his surviving spouse of the member’s accumulated contributions and, if there is no surviving spouse, to the deceased member’s estate;

Ten or more years of creditable service and no surviving spouse, then the death benefit shall consist of a refund to his estate of the member’s accumulated contributions; or

Ten or more years of creditable service and a surviving spouse, then the death benefit, at the option of the surviving spouse, shall consist of a refund to the surviving spouse of the member’s accumulated contributions or the payment to the surviving spouse of the monthly benefit under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section in accordance with the amount of creditable service of the deceased member.

Upon the death of a member in service with more than ten years of creditable service and then thereafter the death of the beneficiary nominated by the member by means of a written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees, or where no beneficiary was so designated by the member and the member was survived by the member’s spouse, the death of the member’s spouse, in the event that the designated beneficiary of the member chose to receive a monthly benefit pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section and the total monthly benefits paid to such designated beneficiary prior to his or her death did not equal or exceed the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of the member’s death, or where no beneficiary was designated and the surviving spouse of the member chose to receive monthly benefits pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section and the monthly benefits paid to the member’s spouse prior to his or her death did not equal or exceed the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of the member’s death, the difference shall be refunded to the person designated in writing by the member to receive such a refund of this difference. If no such person is designated to receive this difference or if such designated person has predeceased the member’s designated beneficiary or spouse, this difference shall be paid to the estate of the designated beneficiary or where no person was designated by the member as beneficiary, to the estate of the member’s spouse.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 267, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1973, p. 905, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1023, § 5; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1442, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 998, § 2.

47-3-124.
Application of minimum retirement allowances to persons who retired pursuant to county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension systems.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Local retirement allowance” means the retirement or pension allowance payable by a local retirement system to a locally retired teacher.

“Local retirement system” means a retirement or pension system of a county, municipality, or local board of education which includes teachers as members thereof or which is paying retirement or pension allowances to locally retired teachers.

“Locally retired teacher” means a teacher who has retired or hereafter retires pursuant to a local retirement system.

“Total retirement allowance” means the local retirement allowance plus any amounts which are payable by the board of trustees to the locally retired teacher pursuant to the provisions of this chapter other than this Code section.

Any other provisions of this chapter or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the minimum retirement allowance provided by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-120 shall be applicable to locally retired teachers who, for such purposes, shall be deemed to be members of this retirement system. In determining the minimum retirement allowance payable under subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-120 to a locally retired teacher, credit shall be given for all teaching service prior to January 1, 1945, under the local retirement system if the local retirement system did not allow its teachers to establish credit for any such service. Subject to the provisions of subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this Code section, for each locally retired teacher whose total retirement allowance is less than the minimum retirement allowance provided for by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-120, the board of trustees shall pay monthly directly to such locally retired teacher an amount equal to the difference between the total retirement allowance and the minimum retirement allowance.

As applied to locally retired teachers who retired prior to July 1, 1986:

The provisions of this Code section shall not decrease the amount payable by the board of trustees to an amount less than the amount payable pursuant to the authority of this Code section prior to July 1, 1986;

Increases in the local retirement allowance granted on or after July 1, 1986, by the local retirement system shall cause the amount payable by the board of trustees pursuant to the authority of this Code section to be decreased in the same amount as the increase granted by the local retirement system; and

Increases in the total retirement allowance payable to a locally retired teacher which hereafter result from new or increased allowances paid by the board of trustees to the locally retired teacher pursuant to provisions of this chapter other than this Code section and Code Section 47-3-126.2 shall not decrease the amount payable by the board of trustees pursuant to the authority of this Code section.

As applied to locally retired teachers who retire on or after July 1, 1986:

Increases in the local retirement allowance granted after retirement by the local retirement system shall cause the amount payable by the board of trustees pursuant to the authority of this Code section to be decreased in the same amount as the increase granted by the local retirement system; and

Increases after retirement in the total retirement allowance payable to a locally retired teacher which result from new or increased allowances paid by the board of trustees to the locally retired teacher pursuant to provisions of this chapter other than this Code section shall not decrease the amount payable by the board of trustees pursuant to the authority of this Code section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, if the minimum retirement allowance provided for by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-120 is increased on or after July 1, 1986, the amount payable by the board of trustees to a locally retired teacher pursuant to the authority of this Code section shall be the greater of either of the following amounts:

The amount necessary to increase the sum of the total retirement allowance plus the amount payable pursuant to the authority of this Code section to an amount equal to the increased minimum retirement allowance; or

The same amount which the board of trustees was paying pursuant to the authority of this Code section on the date the increase in the minimum retirement allowance became effective if the total retirement allowance payable on that date exceeds the increased minimum retirement allowance.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1139, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 237, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1004, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 411, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1986, p. 620, § 2.

47-3-125.
Application of increases in retirement benefits to persons who retired pursuant to county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension systems.

On and after July 1, 1980, and to the extent that the necessary funds are appropriated therefor by the General Assembly, whenever the retirement benefits of beneficiaries under this chapter are increased pursuant to Code Section 47-3-126, the board of trustees shall make a corresponding increase in the retirement benefits of retired public school teachers who retired prior to July 1, 1978, pursuant to a county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension system. Such corresponding increase shall be equivalent to the percentage increase in retirement benefits of beneficiaries under this chapter. For the purposes of this Code section, such retired public school teachers shall be deemed to be members of the retirement system. The board of trustees shall pay directly to each such retired public school teacher the increased retirement benefits provided for in this Code section. Increases in retirement benefits granted on and after July 1, 1980, to such retired public school teachers by a county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension system shall not reduce or replace the increase in retirement benefits payable to such retired public school teachers under this Code section. If the General Assembly at any time appropriates some but not all of the funds necessary to fund the increase in retirement benefits under this Code section, then the increased retirement benefit otherwise payable under this Code section shall be reduced pro rata by the board of trustees in accordance with the funds actually appropriated by the General Assembly for such purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1783, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-3-126.
Postretirement benefit adjustments.

The board of trustees is authorized to adopt a method of providing postretirement benefit adjustments for a beneficiary in his postretirement years. Such method of adjustment may result in the adoption by the board of trustees of a method of financing other than that described in paragraphs (1) through (3) of Code Section 47-3-43 and shall be based upon:

Recommendation of the actuaries for the board of trustees; and

Maintaining the actuarial soundness of the system.

The board of trustees may specify a minimum age which a beneficiary must have attained in order to be eligible for the postretirement benefit adjustment.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 391, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1601, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1011, § 1.

47-3-126.1.
Postretirement benefit adjustments effective July 1, 1984.

As used in this Code section, the term “beneficiary” shall have the meaning specified in paragraph (7) of Code Section 47-3-1 and shall also mean and include any retired public school teacher who retired pursuant to any county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension system.

Subject to the limitations of subsection (c) of this Code section, effective July 1, 1984, the monthly retirement benefit of each beneficiary shall be increased by a percentage which varies in accordance with the time of retirement as follows:

Click to view

The full percentage increase provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section shall apply only to those beneficiaries who had 20 or more years of creditable service at the time of retirement. For those beneficiaries who had at least ten but less than 20 years of creditable service at the time of retirement, the monthly benefit increase provided for by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be reduced by 5 percent for each year less than 20 years of creditable service. Beneficiaries who had less than ten years of creditable service shall not receive an increase in their monthly retirement benefit under this Code section. No retirement benefit shall exceed $1,500.00 per month as a result of an increase in the monthly retirement benefit under this Code section.

The implementation of the monthly retirement benefit increases provided for by this Code section shall be contingent upon appropriations by the General Assembly specifically for the purpose of funding the provisions of this Code section. In the event the General Assembly appropriates an amount which is insufficient to fund fully the benefit increases provided for by this Code section, the benefit increases shall be reduced pro rata in accordance with the amount actually appropriated, and, in that event, the provisions of this Code section shall remain effective until, in subsequent annual appropriations, the benefit increases provided for in this Code section are fully funded and implemented. When fully funded and implemented, this Code section shall not provide any authority for the board of trustees to grant additional postretirement benefit adjustments, but this Code section shall not supersede or repeal the authority granted to the board of trustees by Code Section 47-3-126.

Time of Retirement Percentage Increase Prior to July 1, 1964 20.0 July 1, 1964, through June 30, 1965 19.5 July 1, 1965, through June 30, 1966 18.0 July 1, 1966, through June 30, 1967 16.5 July 1, 1967, through June 30, 1968 15.0 July 1, 1968, through June 30, 1969 13.5 July 1, 1969, through June 30, 1970 12.0 July 1, 1970, through June 30, 1971 10.5 July 1, 1971, through June 30, 1972 9.0 July 1, 1972, through June 30, 1973 7.5 July 1, 1973, through June 30, 1974 6.0 July 1, 1974, through June 30, 1975 5.0 July 1, 1975, through June 30, 1976 4.0 July 1, 1976, through June 30, 1977 3.0 July 1, 1977, through June 30, 1978 2.0 July 1, 1978, through June 30, 1980 1.0 After June 30, 1980 0

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-126.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 990, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-3-126.2.
Postretirement benefit adjustments effective July 1, 1986.

As used in this Code section, the term “beneficiary” shall have the meaning specified in paragraph (7) of Code Section 47-3-1 and shall also mean:

Any retired teacher who retired pursuant to any county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension system;

The surviving spouse of any retired teacher who retired pursuant to a county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension system if such surviving spouse is eligible to receive and is receiving a monthly benefit pursuant to the local retirement or pension system; and

The surviving spouse of a teacher who was a member of a county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension system and who died prior to retirement if such surviving spouse is eligible to receive and is receiving a monthly benefit pursuant to the local retirement or pension system.

Effective July 1, 1986, the monthly retirement benefit of each beneficiary who was receiving a benefit on July 1, 1981, shall be increased by:

One dollar for each full year of creditable service which the beneficiary had at the time of retirement; plus

One dollar for each full year which has elapsed from the date of retirement until July 1, 1981.

When the postretirement benefit adjustment provided by this Code section has been granted, there shall be no further postretirement benefit adjustments pursuant to the authority of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-126.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 620, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-3-126.3.
Postretirement benefit adjustments.

As used in this Code section, the term “beneficiary” shall have the meaning specified in paragraph (7) of Code Section 47-3-1 and shall also mean and include any retired public school teacher who retired pursuant to any county, municipal, or local board of education retirement or pension system.

Subject to the limitations of subsection (c) of this Code section, effective July 1, 1988, the monthly retirement benefit of each beneficiary shall be increased by a percentage which varies in accordance with the time of retirement as follows:

Click to view

The full percentage increase provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section shall apply only to those beneficiaries who had 20 or more years of creditable service at the time of retirement. For those beneficiaries who had at least ten but less than 20 years of creditable service at the time of retirement, the monthly benefit increase provided for by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be reduced by 5 percent for each year less than 20 years of creditable service. Beneficiaries who had less than ten years of creditable service shall not receive an increase in their monthly retirement benefit under this Code section. No one person’s retirement benefit or combination of retirement benefits shall exceed $1,500.00 per month as a result of an increase in the monthly retirement benefit under this Code section.

Time of Retirement Percentage Increase Prior to July 1, 1964 15.0 July 1, 1964, through June 30, 1969 13.0 July 1, 1969, through June 30, 1970 10.0 July 1, 1970, through June 30, 1971 8.0 July 1, 1971, through June 30, 1972 7.0 July 1, 1972, through June 30, 1973 6.0 July 1, 1973, through June 30, 1974 5.5 July 1, 1974, through June 30, 1975 5.0 July 1, 1975, through June 30, 1976 4.0 July 1, 1976, through June 30, 1977 3.5 July 1, 1977, through June 30, 1978 3.0 July 1, 1978, through June 30, 1979 2.5 July 1, 1979, through June 30, 1980 2.0 July 1, 1980, through June 30, 1981 1.5 July 1, 1981, through June 30, 1982 1.0 July 1, 1982, through June 30, 1983 0.5 July 1, 1983, through June 30, 1984 0.5 After June 30, 1984 0.0

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-126.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 343, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.